Washington statutes.
RCW 36.100.036

Donated moneys for baseball stadium.

A public facilities district may accept and expend moneys that may be donated for the purpose of a baseball stadium as defined in RCW 82.14.0485.

[ 1995 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 304.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Effective date—1995 3rd sp.s. c 1: See notes following RCW 82.14.0485.